Massachusetts, session 194th, H4578.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Article II Legislative Branch
Section 2-2. General Powers and Duties
(c) Powers and Duties:
(3) The council president shall be recognized as the official head of the town for all
ceremonial purposes and the council president, or his (change to; their) designee, shall represent
the town in its relations with other units of government.
Section 2-12. Prohibitions; Term Limits
(a) Prohibitions- No councilor shall, while a member of the town council, hold any other
town office or position. Elected charter commission membership shall not be considered to be a
town office or position. No former councilor shall hold any compensated appointive town office
of 2

or town employment until 1 year after the expiration of his (change to; their) service on the town
council. This provision shall not prevent a town officer or employee who has taken a leave of
absence from such duties in order to serve as a member of the town council from returning to
such office or employment following service as a member of the town council. Any councilor
who has been finally convicted of a criminal offense involving misconduct in any elective or
appointive public office, trust or employment at any time held by him (change to: them) shall be
deemed to have vacated office and not be eligible to serve in any other elective or appointive
office or position in the town.
Article VI. Financial Management
Section 6-1. Annual Budget Policy
The council president shall call a joint meeting of the town council, the regional school
committee chairman or his (change to: their) designee, the finance committee, the town manager
and any other committees established for the budget process, before the commencement of the
budget [process to review the financial condition of the town, revenue, and expenditure forecasts
and other relevant information in order to develop a coordinated budget.
of 2